Utah statutes.
35A-4-305.   Collection of contributions -- Unpaid contributions to bear
interest.
(1) (a)  Contributions unpaid on the date on which they are due and payable,
as prescribed by the division, shall bear interest at the rate of 1% per month
from and after that date until payment plus accrued interest is received by
the division.
(b) (i)  Contribution reports not made and filed by the date on which they are
due as prescribed by the division are subject to a penalty to be assessed and
collected in the same manner as contributions due under this section equal to
5% of the contribution due if the failure to file on time was not more than 15
days, with an additional 5% for each additional 15 days or fraction thereof
during which the failure continued, but not to exceed 25% in the aggregate and
not less than $25 with respect to each reporting period.
(ii)  If a report is filed after the required time and it is shown to the
satisfaction of the division or its authorized representative that the failure
to file was due to a reasonable cause and not to willful neglect, no addition
shall be made to the contribution.
(c) (i)  If contributions are unpaid after ten days from the date of the
mailing or personal delivery by the division or its authorized representative,
of a written demand for payment, there shall attach to the contribution, to be
assessed and collected in the same manner as contributions due under this
section, a penalty equal to 5% of the contribution due.
(ii)  A penalty may not attach if within ten days after the mailing or
personal delivery, arrangements for payment have been made with the division,
or its authorized representative, and payment is made in accordance with those
arrangements.
(d)  The division shall assess as a penalty a service charge, in addition to
any other penalties that may apply, in an amount not to exceed the service
charge imposed by Section 7-15-1 for dishonored instruments if:
(i)  any amount due the division for contributions, interest, other penalties
or benefit overpayments is paid by check, draft, order, or other instrument;
and
(ii)  the instrument is dishonored or not paid by the institution against
which it is drawn.
(e)  Except for benefit overpayments under Subsection 35A-4-405(5), benefit
overpayments, contributions, interest, penalties, and assessed costs,
uncollected three years after they become due, may be charged as uncollectible
and removed from the records of the division if:
(i)  no assets belonging to the liable person and subject to attachment can be
found; and
(ii)  in the opinion of the division there is no likelihood of collection at a
future date.
(f)  Interest and penalties collected in accordance with this section shall be
paid into the Special Administrative Expense Fund.
(g)  Action required for the collection of sums due under this chapter is
subject to the applicable limitations of actions under Title 78B, Chapter 2,
Statutes of Limitations.
(2) (a)  If an employer fails to file a report when prescribed by the division
for the purpose of determining the amount of the employer's contribution due
under this chapter, or if the report when filed is incorrect or insufficient
or is not satisfactory to the division, the division may determine the amount
of wages paid for employment during the period or periods with respect to
which the reports were or should have been made and the amount of contribution
due from the employer on the basis of any information it may be able to
obtain.
(b)  The division shall give written notice of the determination to the
employer.
(c)  The determination is considered correct unless:
(i)  the employer, within ten days after mailing or personal delivery of
notice of the determination, applies to the division for a review of the
determination as provided in Section 35A-4-508; or
(ii)  unless the division or its authorized representative of its own motion
reviews the determination.
(d)  The amount of contribution determined under Subsection (2)(a) is subject
to penalties and interest as provided in Subsection (1).
(3) (a)  If, after due notice, an employer defaults in the payment of
contributions, interest, or penalties on the contributions, or a claimant
defaults in a repayment of benefit overpayments and penalties on the
overpayments, the amount due shall be collectible by civil action in the name
of the division, and the employer adjudged in default shall pay the costs of
the action.
(b)  Civil actions brought under this section to collect contributions,
interest, or penalties from an employer, or benefit overpayments and penalties
from a claimant shall be:
(i)  heard by the court at the earliest possible date; and
(ii)  entitled to preference upon the calendar of the court over all other
civil actions except:
(A)  petitions for judicial review under this chapter; and
(B)  cases arising under the workers' compensation law of this state.
(c) (i) (A)  To collect contributions, interest, or penalties, or benefit
overpayments and penalties due from employers or claimants located outside
Utah, the division may employ private collectors providing debt collection
services outside Utah.
(B)  Accounts may be placed with private collectors only after the employer or
claimant has been given a final notice that the division intends to place the
account with a private collector for further collection action.
(C)  The notice shall advise the employer or claimant of the employer's or
claimant's rights under this chapter and the applicable rules of the
department.
(ii) (A)  A private collector may receive as compensation up to 25% of the
lesser of the amount collected or the amount due, plus the costs and fees of
any civil action or postjudgment remedy instituted by the private collector
with the approval of the division.
(B)  The employer or claimant shall be liable to pay the compensation of the
collector, costs, and fees in addition to the original amount due.
(iii)  A private collector is subject to the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692 et seq.
(iv) (A)  A civil action may not be maintained by a private collector without
specific prior written approval of the division.
(B)  When division approval is given for civil action against an employer or
claimant, the division may cooperate with the private collector to the extent
necessary to effect the civil action.
(d) (i)  Notwithstanding Section 35A-4-312, the division may disclose the
contribution, interest, penalties or benefit overpayments and penalties, costs
due, the name of the employer or claimant, and the employer's or claimant's
address and telephone number when any collection matter is referred to a
private collector under Subsection (3)(c).
(ii)  A private collector is subject to the confidentiality requirements and
penalty provisions provided in Section 35A-4-312 and Subsection 76-8-1301(4),
except to the extent disclosure is necessary in a civil action to enforce
collection of the amounts due.
(e)  An action taken by the division under this section may not be construed
to be an election to forego other collection procedures by the division.
(4) (a)  In the event of a distribution of an employer's assets under an order
of a court under the laws of Utah, including a receivership, assignment for
benefits of creditors, adjudicated insolvency, composition, or similar
proceedings, contributions then or thereafter due shall be paid in full prior
to all other claims except taxes and claims for wages of not more than $400 to
each claimant, earned within five months of the commencement of the
proceeding.
(b)  If an employer commences a proceeding in the Federal Bankruptcy Court
under a chapter of 11 U.S.C. 101 et seq., as amended by the Bankruptcy Abuse
Prevention and Consumer Protection Act of 2005, contributions, interest, and
penalties then or thereafter due shall be entitled to the priority provided
for taxes, interest, and penalties in the Bankruptcy Abuse Prevention and
Consumer Protection Act of 2005.
(5) (a)  In addition and as an alternative to any other remedy provided by
this chapter and provided that no appeal or other proceeding for review
provided by this chapter is then pending and the time for taking it has
expired, the division may issue a warrant in duplicate, under its official
seal, directed to the sheriff of any county of the state, commanding the
sheriff to levy upon and sell the real and personal property of a delinquent
employer or claimant found within the sheriff's county for the payment of the
contributions due, with the added penalties, interest, or benefit overpayment
and penalties, and costs, and to return the warrant to the division and pay
into the fund the money collected by virtue of the warrant by a time to be
specified in the warrant, not more than 60 days from the date of the warrant.
(b) (i)  Immediately upon receipt of the warrant in duplicate, the sheriff
shall file the duplicate with the clerk of the district court in the sheriff's
county.
(ii)  The clerk shall enter in the judgment docket, in the column for judgment
debtors, the name of the delinquent employer or claimant mentioned in the
warrant, and in appropriate columns the amount of the contribution, penalties,
interest, or benefit overpayment and penalties, and costs, for which the
warrant is issued and the date when the duplicate is filed.
(c)  The amount of the docketed warrant shall:
(i)  have the force and effect of an execution against all personal property
of the delinquent employer; and
(ii)  become a lien upon the real property of the delinquent employer or
claimant in the same manner and to the same extent as a judgment duly rendered
by a district court and docketed in the office of the clerk.
(d)  After docketing, the sheriff shall:
(i)  proceed in the same manner as is prescribed by law with respect to
execution issued against property upon judgments of a court of record; and
(ii)  be entitled to the same fees for the sheriff's services in executing the
warrant, to be collected in the same manner.
(6) (a)  Contributions imposed by this chapter are a lien upon the property of
an employer liable for the contribution required to be collected under this
section who shall sell out the employer's business or stock of goods or shall
quit business, if the employer fails to make a final report and payment on the
date subsequent to the date of selling or quitting business on which they are
due and payable as prescribed by rule.
(b) (i)  An employer's successor, successors, or assigns, if any, are required
to withhold sufficient of the purchase money to cover the amount of the
contributions and interest or penalties due and payable until the former owner
produces a receipt from the division showing that they have been paid or a
certificate stating that no amount is due.
(ii)  If the purchaser of a business or stock of goods fails to withhold
sufficient purchase money, the purchaser is personally liable for the payment
of the amount of the contributions required to be paid by the former owner,
interest and penalties accrued and unpaid by the former owner, owners, or
assignors.
(7) (a)  If an employer is delinquent in the payment of a contribution, the
division may give notice of the amount of the delinquency by registered mail
to all persons having in their possession or under their control, any credits
or other personal property belonging to the employer, or owing any debts to
the employer at the time of the receipt by them of the notice.
(b)  A person notified under Subsection (7)(a) shall neither transfer nor make
any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts until:
(i)  the division has consented to a transfer or disposition; or
(ii)  20 days after the receipt of the notice.
(c)  All persons notified under Subsection (7)(a) shall, within five days
after receipt of the notice, advise the division of credits, other personal
property, or other debts in their possession, under their control or owing by
them, as the case may be.
(8) (a) (i)  Each employer shall furnish the division necessary information
for the proper administration of this chapter and shall include wage
information for each employee, for each calendar quarter.
(ii)  The information shall be furnished at a time, in the form, and to those
individuals as the department may by rule require.
(b) (i)  Each employer shall furnish each individual worker who is separated
that information as the department may by rule require, and shall furnish
within 48 hours of the receipt of a request from the division a report of the
earnings of any individual during the individual's base-period.
(ii)  The report shall be on a form prescribed by the division and contain all
information prescribed by the division.
(c) (i)  For each failure by an employer to conform to this Subsection (8) the
division shall, unless good cause is shown, assess a $50 penalty if the filing
was not more than 15 days late.
(ii)  If the filing is more than 15 days late, the division shall assess an
additional penalty of $50 for each 15 days, or a fraction of the 15 days that
the filing is late, not to exceed $250 per filing.
(iii)  The penalty is to be collected in the same manner as contributions due
under this chapter.
(d) (i)  The division shall prescribe rules providing standards for
determining which contribution reports must be filed on magnetic or electronic
media or in other machine-readable form.
(ii)  In prescribing these rules, the division:
(A)  may not require an employer to file contribution reports on magnetic or
electronic media unless the employer is required to file wage data on at least
250 employees during any calendar quarter or is an authorized employer
representative who files quarterly tax reports on behalf of 100 or more
employers during any calendar quarter;
(B)  shall take into account, among other relevant factors, the ability of the
employer to comply at reasonable cost with the requirements of the rules; and
(C)  may require an employer to post a bond for failure to comply with the
rules required by this Subsection (8)(d).
(9) (a) (i)  An employer liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall
file Reimbursable Employment and Wage Reports.
(ii)  The reports are due on the last day of the month that follows the end of
each calendar quarter unless the division, after giving notice, changes the
due date.
(iii)  A report postmarked on or before the due date is considered timely.
(b) (i)  Unless the employer can show good cause, the division shall assess a
$50 penalty against an employer who does not file Reimbursable Employment and
Wage Reports within the time limits set out in Subsection (9)(a) if the filing
was not more than 15 days late.
(ii)  If the filing is more than 15 days late, the division shall assess an
additional penalty of $50 for each 15 days, or a fraction of the 15 days that
the filing is late, not to exceed $250 per filing.
(iii)  The division shall assess and collect the penalties referred to in this
Subsection (9)(b) in the same manner as prescribed in Sections 35A-4-309 and
35A-4-311.
(10)  If a person liable to pay a contribution or benefit overpayment imposed
by this chapter neglects or refuses to pay it after demand, the amount,
including any interest, additional amount, addition to contributions, or
assessable penalty, together with any additional accruable costs, shall be a
lien in favor of the division upon all property and rights to property,
whether real or personal belonging to the person.
(11) (a)  The lien imposed by Subsection (10) arises at the time the
assessment, as defined in the department rules, is made and continues until
the liability for the amount assessed, or a judgment against the taxpayer
arising out of the liability, is satisfied.
(b) (i)  The lien imposed by Subsection (10) is not valid as against a
purchaser, holder of a security interest, mechanics' lien holder, or judgment
lien creditor until the division files a warrant with the clerk of the
district court.
(ii)  For the purposes of this Subsection (11)(b):
(A)  "Judgment lien creditor" means a person who obtains a valid judgment of a
court of record for recovery of specific property or a sum certain of money,
and who in the case of a recovery of money, has a perfected lien under the
judgment on the property involved.  A judgment lien does not include inchoate
liens such as attachment or garnishment liens until they ripen into a
judgment.  A judgment lien does not include the determination or assessment of
a quasi-judicial authority, such as a state or federal taxing authority.
(B)  "Mechanics' lien holder" means any person who has a lien on real
property, or on the proceeds of a contract relating to real property, for
services, labor, or materials furnished in connection with the construction or
improvement of the property.  A person has a lien on the earliest date the
lien becomes valid against subsequent purchasers without actual notice, but
not before the person begins to furnish the services, labor, or materials.
(C)  "Person" means:
(I)  an individual;
(II)  a trust;
(III)  an estate;
(IV)  a partnership;
(V)  an association;
(VI)  a company;
(VII)  a limited liability company;
(VIII)  a limited liability partnership; or
(IX)  a corporation.
(D)  "Purchaser" means a person who, for adequate and full consideration in
money or money's worth, acquires an interest, other than a lien or security
interest, in property which is valid under state law against subsequent
purchasers without actual notice.
(E)  "Security interest" means any interest in property acquired by contract
for the purpose of securing payment or performance of an obligation or
indemnifying against loss or liability.  A security interest exists at any
time:
(I)  the property is in existence and the interest has become protected under
the law against a subsequent judgment lien arising out of an unsecured
obligation; and
(II)  to the extent that, at that time, the holder has parted with money or
money's worth.
